Alabama, session 2026rs, HB422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Greater Peace Community Development
Corporation is exempt from paying any state sales and use
taxes.
(b) Any county or municipality may exempt this entity
from payment of county or municipal sales and use taxes in
accordance with Section 40-23-4.01, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
HB422 INTRODUCED
1, 2026.
Page 2